District of Columbia statutes.
31-2993.03

Right to file grievance.

This chapter shall not limit, prohibit, or modify a qualified individual’s right to:

(1)

File a grievance and use an independent review process, if available; or

(2)

Use the independent medical review system.

History

June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-166, § 4, 55 DCR 5174